California, session 20252026, AB1712.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 37420.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:37420.5. (a) Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 10051) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of the Public Utilities Code, the City of Santa Fe Springs may sell its public utility for furnishing water service pursuant to this article for the purpose of consolidating its public water system with another public water system if its legislative body determines that it is not in the public interest to own and operate the public utility for furnishing water service, subject to all of the following requirements:(1) The legislative body of the city shall not sell the water utility property for less than its fair market value, as defined in Section 1263.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(2) The legislative body of the city shall not sell the water utility property without obtaining a four-fifths vote of the city’s legislative body.(3) The city’s existing water supply is contaminated, impaired, or otherwise presents a risk to public health, and the city lacks the technical, managerial, or financial capacity to provide for necessary treatment or replacement, or the cost of continued operation, maintenance, or treatment by the city would impose an unreasonable financial burden on ratepayers, as demonstrated by an independent financial analysis applying financial industry standards in adherence to Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution, commonly referred to as Proposition 218.(4) The receiving water system’s service area borders the service area of the subsumed water system.(4)(5) Consolidation of the water systems shall be economically feasible for the ratepayers of the subsumed water system. Ratepayers of the subsumed water system shall be notified of the applicable rate that will be in effect during the first year after consolidation has been completed. Any rate increases following the sale of a public utility for furnishing water service shall be phased in over time.(5)(6) Consolidation of the water systems shall ensure continued water service to all existing customers without interruption or degradation in service quality.(6)(7) (A) The legislative body of the city shall not sell its public utility for furnishing water service unless it considers oral and written protests at its second regularly scheduled meeting following the adoption of a resolution pursuant to Section 37422 and publication pursuant to subparagraph (B). In addition to the requirements of Section 37422, the resolution shall allow 45 days for hearing protests to the sale and shall state the city’s intended use of the sale proceeds. Notice of the sale may be given by including notice in the agency’s regular billing statement. One written protest per parcel, filed by an owner or tenant of the parcel, shall be counted in calculating a protest. The city shall maintain all written protests for a minimum of two years following the date of the hearing to consider written protests. (B) Notwithstanding Section 37423, the resolution shall be published at least once in a daily newspaper published and circulated in the city or, if there is none, the legislative body shall designate a newspaper published in the county. It shall also be posted for not less than 10 days in at least three conspicuous places in the city.(C) (i) Notwithstanding Section 37425, if the legislative body of the city finds that protests have been filed by at least 10 percent of interested persons, the legislative body of the city shall call an election pursuant to Section 37427. If an election is called pursuant to this paragraph, the legislative body of the city shall not sell the public utility for furnishing water service unless the sale is approved by a majority of the city’s registered voters voting on the issue.(ii) If 50 percent or more of interested persons protest the sale of the public utility, the city shall not take further steps for the sale of the public utility. The city, after one year has passed, may sell the public utility if the requirements of this section are met, including adoption of a new resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A).(iii) For purposes of this paragraph, “interested person” means a person who is a resident of the city proposing to sell its public utility pursuant to this section and a person who is not a resident of the city but who is a ratepayer of the public utility proposed to be sold pursuant to this section.(7)(8) The legislative body of the city has adopted a resolution, at a regularly scheduled meeting, that paragraphs (1) to (6), (7), inclusive, have been met.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances in the City of Santa Fe Springs.